District of Columbia statutes.
47-4502

Program established.

There is established the District of Columbia College Savings Program, which authorizes the creation of college savings accounts to enable residents of the District of Columbia to benefit from the tax incentives provided for qualified tuition programs under the Internal Revenue Code. The Program shall be established as a trust and designated as the District of Columbia College Savings Program Trust. The District of Columbia College Savings Program Trust shall constitute an instrumentality of the District of Columbia. The Chief Financial Officer, or his or her designee, upon lawful delegation, shall serve as the Trustee of the District of Columbia College Savings Program Trust. The Trust shall continue in existence as long as it holds any deposits, payments, contributions, or other funds or has any obligations and until its existence is terminated by law. The Trust shall receive and hold all payments, deposits, and contributions intended for the Trust, gifts, bequests, endowments, federal and local grants, and any other funds from any public or private source, and all earnings thereon, until disbursed in accordance with this chapter. All amounts or funds deposited and held in the Trust shall constitute assets of the Trust and shall not be commingled with or revert to the general, special, emergency, or temporary funds of the District of Columbia at the end of any fiscal year or at any other time.

Mar. 31, 2001, D.C. Law 13-212, § 2(b), 47 DCR 9457
June 5, 2003, D.C. Law 14-307, § 2402(c), 49 DCR 11664
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-103, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5499).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(c) of the Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-27, February 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2151).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2402(c) of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Amendment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-544, December 4, 2002, 49 DCR 11700).
D.C. Law 14-307 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “There is established the District of Columbia College Savings Program, which authorizes the creation of college savings accounts to enable residents of the District of Columbia to benefit from the tax incentives provided for qualified state tuition programs under the Internal Revenue Code.”
This section is referenced in § 47-4501.